Vermont statutes. Title 3 Executive
Subchapter 3. Professional Regulation

§ 121.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Director” means the Director of the Office of Professional Regulation.

“Licensing board” or “board” refers to the boards, commissions, and professions listed in section 122 of this subchapter and, in the case of disciplinary matters or denials of licensure, either an administrative law officer appointed under subsection 129(j) of this subchapter or the Director in advisor professions. Notwithstanding statutory language to the contrary, this subchapter shall apply to all those boards.

“License” includes any certification, registration, permit, commission, or other official authorization to undertake a regulated activity.
(3) (A) “License” includes any certification, registration, permit, commission, or other official authorization to undertake a regulated activity.

“Licensee” includes any person to whom a license has been issued by a board or the Director.

“Office” means the Office of Professional Regulation.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1997, No. 40

, § 1;

2001, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2005, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2019, No. 30

, § 1.

§ 122.
Office of Professional Regulation.

The Office of Professional Regulation is created within the Office of the Secretary of State. The Office shall have a director who shall be qualified by education and professional experience to perform the duties of the position. The Director of the Office of Professional Regulation shall be a classified position with the Office of the Secretary of State. The following boards or professions are attached to the Office of Professional Regulation:

Board of Architects

Barbers and Cosmetologists

Board of Chiropractic

Board of Allied Mental Health Practitioners

Board of Dental Examiners

Funeral Service

Board of Professional Engineering

Board of Land Surveyors

[Repealed.]

Board of Nursing

Nursing Home Administrators

Opticians

Board of Optometry

Board of Osteopathic Physicians and Surgeons

Board of Pharmacy

Physical Therapists

Radiologic Technology

Private Investigative and Security Services

Board of Public Accountancy

Board of Veterinary Medicine

Motor Vehicle Racing

Boxing

Board of Psychological Examiners

Real Estate Commission

Clinical Social Workers

Acupuncturists

Tattooists and Body Piercers

Audiologists and Hearing Aid Dispensers

Real Estate Appraisers

Auctioneers

Occupational Therapists

Dietitians

Respiratory Care Practitioners

Psychoanalysts

Foresters

[Repealed.]

Naturopathic Physicians

Athletic Trainers

Midwifery

Electrology

Speech-Language Pathologists

Landscape Architects

Property Inspectors

Applied Behavior Analysts

Alcohol and Drug Abuse Counselors

Potable Water Supply and Wastewater System Designers

Pollution Abatement Facility Operators

Notaries Public

Massage Therapists, Bodyworkers, and Touch Professionals

Well Drillers

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1989, No. 264

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1991, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 61;

1991, No. 236

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1993, No. 102

, § 2;

1993, No. 103

, § 2;

1993, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 18;

1995, No. 79

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1995, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1997, No. 40

, § 76;

1997, No. 108

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1999;

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 52;

2001, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2001, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 49, eff. July 1, 2003;

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2013, No. 136

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2013, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2015, No. 38

, § 45, eff. July 1, 2016;

2015, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2016;

2015, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. Jan. 1, 2017;

2015, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2019, No. 30

, § 2;

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Oct. 1, 2020;

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 28, eff. April 1, 2021;

2021, No. 69

, § 1, eff. June 8, 2021.

§ 123.
Duties of office.

The Office shall provide administrative, secretarial, financial, investigatory, inspection, and legal services to the boards. The services provided by the Office shall include:

Sending, receiving, and processing applications for licenses.

Issuing, recording, renewing, and reinstating all licenses as ordered by the boards, an appellate officer, the Director, an administrative law officer, or a court.

Revoking or suspending licenses as ordered by the boards, the Director, an administrative law officer, or a court.

Keeping all files and records of the boards, including minutes of meetings.

Compiling and maintaining a current register of all licensees.

Compiling and maintaining statistical information for each board, including the number of applications received; the number of licenses, certificates, registrations, and permits issued, renewed, and reinstated; examination results; the number and disposition of inspections and complaints; and the number of board meetings.

Collecting and depositing all fees into the Professional Regulatory Fee Fund.

Arranging payment of all expenses incurred by the boards within the limits of the funds appropriated to them.

Standardizing, to the extent feasible and with the advice of the boards, all applications, licenses, and other related forms and procedures, and adopting uniform procedural rules governing the investigatory and disciplinary process for all boards set forth in section 122 of this chapter.

Notifying the public and board members of all meetings and examinations to be held by the boards and arranging for places for those meetings and examinations.

Assisting the boards in developing rules consistent with the principles set forth in 26 V.S.A. chapter 57. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Secretary of State shall serve as the adopting authority for those rules.

With the assistance of the boards, establishing a schedule of license renewal and termination dates so as to distribute the renewal work in the Office as effectively as possible.

Licenses may be issued and renewed according to that schedule for periods of up to two years.

A person whose initial license is issued within 90 days prior to the set renewal date shall not be required to renew the license until the end of the first full biennial licensing period following initial licensure.

To the extent that resources permit, providing other administrative services that are necessary or desirable for the efficient operation of the boards.

The Director shall consult with each board and prepare a consolidated budget for the Office. The consolidated budget shall also contain funds deemed to be required by the Director for the administration of this chapter. The Director shall submit the consolidated budget to the Secretary of State.

The Director may purchase examination materials and contract with examination providers to administer examinations.

The Director may adopt procedures for the effective administration of this section.

The Secretary of State shall contract with and appoint one or more attorneys licensed to practice in this State to serve as administrative law officers under subsection 129(j) of this title or appellate officers under section 130a of this title.

Classified State employees who are employed as investigators by the Secretary of State who have successfully met the standards of training for a Level III law enforcement officer under 20 V.S.A. chapter 151 shall have the same powers as sheriffs in criminal matters and the enforcement of the law and in serving criminal process, and shall have all the immunities and matters of defense now available or hereafter made available to sheriffs in a suit brought against them in consequence for acts done in the course of their employment.

The Office shall establish uniform procedures applicable to all of the professions and boards set forth in section 122 of this chapter, providing for:
(g) (1) The Office shall establish uniform procedures applicable to all of the professions and boards set forth in section 122 of this chapter, providing for:

appropriate recognition of education, training, or service completed by a member of the U.S. Armed Forces toward the requirements of professional licensure; and

expedited issuance of a professional license to a person who is licensed in good standing in another regulatory jurisdiction; and

whose spouse is a member of the U.S. Armed Forces and who has been subject to a military transfer to Vermont; and

who left employment to accompany his or her spouse to Vermont.

The Director may evaluate specific military credentials to determine equivalency to credentials required for professions attached to the Office. The determinations shall be adopted through written policy that shall be posted on the Office’s website.

The Director may evaluate apprenticeship programs recognized or administered by the Vermont Department of Labor, Agency of Education, or U.S. Department of Labor to determine equivalency to credentials required for professions attached to the Office. The determinations shall be adopted through written policy that shall be posted on the Office’s website.

Notwithstanding any provision of Title 26 of the Vermont Statutes Annotated to the contrary, the Office, on behalf of the Director or a board, may use electronic mail to send notices and reminders that would otherwise be sent by mail, except certified mail, and may use online services to elicit information and sworn attestations that would otherwise be obtained on a paper form.

The Director shall actively monitor the actions of boards attached to the Office and shall ensure that all board actions pursued or decided are lawful, consistent with State policy, reasonably calculated to protect the public, and not an undue restraint of trade.
(i) (1) The Director shall actively monitor the actions of boards attached to the Office and shall ensure that all board actions pursued or decided are lawful, consistent with State policy, reasonably calculated to protect the public, and not an undue restraint of trade.

If the Director finds an exercise of board authority or discretion does not meet those standards, the Director may, except in the case of disciplinary actions:

provide written notice to the board explaining the perceived inconsistency, which notice shall have the effect of staying that action and implementing any alternative prescribed by the Director;

schedule a public meeting with the board to resolve questions about the action and explore alternatives; and

within 60 days following that meeting, issue a written directive finding that:

the exercise of board authority or discretion is consistent with State policy, in which case the action shall be reinstated;

the exercise of board authority or discretion is inconsistent with State policy in form, but may be modified to achieve consistency, in which case the board may issue a modified action consistent with the Director’s recommendation; or

the exercise of board authority or discretion is inconsistent with State policy in purpose, in which case any alternative prescribed by the Director shall stand as the regulatory policy of the State.

The Office may inquire into the criminal background histories of applicants for initial licensure and for license renewal of any Office-issued credential, including a license, certification, registration, or specialty designation for the following professions:
(j) (1) The Office may inquire into the criminal background histories of applicants for initial licensure and for license renewal of any Office-issued credential, including a license, certification, registration, or specialty designation for the following professions:

licensed nursing assistants, licensed practical nurses, registered nurses, and advanced practice registered nurses licensed under 26 V.S.A. chapter 28;

private investigators, security guards, and other persons licensed under 26 V.S.A. chapter 59;

real estate appraisers and other persons or business entities licensed under 26 V.S.A. chapter 69; and

osteopathic physicians licensed under 26 V.S.A. chapter 33.

Prior to acting on an initial or renewal application, the Office may obtain with respect to the applicant a Vermont criminal history record, an out-of-state criminal history record, and a criminal history record from the Federal Bureau of Investigation. Federal Bureau of Investigation background checks shall be fingerprint-supported, and fingerprints so obtained may be retained on file and used to notify the Office of future triggering events. Each applicant shall consent to the release of criminal history records to the Office on forms developed by the Vermont Crime Information Center.

Applicants subject to background checks shall be notified that a check is required, if fingerprints will be retained on file, and that criminal convictions are not an absolute bar to licensure, and shall be provided such other information as may be required by federal law or regulation.

For any profession attached to it, the Office shall provide a pre-application determination of an individual’s criminal background. This determination shall not be binding on the Office in a future application if the individual violates probation or parole or is convicted of another crime following the determination.

The Office shall initiate this determination upon an individual’s “second chance” determination request. This request shall provide documentation related to the individual’s conviction or convictions, evidence of rehabilitation, and identification of the profession or professions for which the individual seeks licensure.

The individual shall submit this request online, accompanied by the fee for preapplication determinations set forth in section 125 of this subchapter. If the individual thereafter applies for licensure, this preapplication fee shall be deducted from that license application fee.

The Office shall:

process a request within 30 days of receiving a complete request;

assess the nature of the underlying conviction or convictions, the nexus to the profession or professions for which the individual seeks licensure, and the provided evidence of rehabilitation; and

respond to the individual’s request in writing.

When, by reason of disqualification, resignation, vacancy, or necessary absence, a board is unable to form a quorum or assign one or more members to assist in the investigation and prosecution of complaints or license applications, or to adjudicate a contested case, the Secretary of State may appoint ad hoc members, either as voting members to establish a quorum at a specific meeting or as nonvoting members to assist Office investigators and prosecutors.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1997, No. 40

, § 2;

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 51;

2003, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 78g;

2005, No. 27

, § 1;

2007, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2009, No. 33

, § 4;

2009, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2013, No. 27

, § 1;

2013, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2013, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. July 1, 2015;

2017, No. 48

, § 1;

2017, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 2020;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2019, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 1, 2021;

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Oct. 1, 2020;

2021, No. 69

, § 2.

§ 124.
Professional Regulatory Fee Fund.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, it is the policy of this State that:

the cost of regulating a profession attached to the Office of Professional Regulation should be borne by the profession; and

one profession should not subsidize the cost of regulating another profession.

Professions regulated by the Director in consultation with advisor appointees shall share the cost of regulating those professions.

A Professional Regulatory Fee Fund is created. All revenues received by the office shall be deposited into the Fund, credited to the appropriate board or to the professions regulated by the Director as a group, as appropriate, shall be used to offset up to two years of the costs incurred by that board or that group and shall not be used for any purpose other than professional regulation.

To ensure that revenues derived by the Office are adequate to offset the cost of regulation, the Secretary of State shall review fees from time to time, and present proposed fee changes to the General Assembly.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1991, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 62;

1997, No. 59

, § 44, eff. June 30, 1997;

1999, No. 52

, § 1;

2007, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 125.
Fees.

In addition to the fees otherwise authorized by law, a board or advisor profession may charge the following fees:

Verification of license, $20.00.

An examination fee established by the Secretary, which shall be no greater than the costs associated with examinations.

Reinstatement fees for expired licenses pursuant to section 127 (unauthorized practice) of this title.

Continuing, qualifying, or prelicensing education course approval:

Provider, $100.00.

Individual, $25.00.

A preapplication criminal background determination, $25.00.

Unless otherwise provided by law, the following fees shall apply to all professions regulated by the Director in consultation with advisor appointees under Title 26:

Application for registration, $75.00, except application for:

Private investigator and security services employees, unarmed registrants, $60.00.

Private investigator and security service employees, transitory permits, $60.00.

Private investigator and security service employees, armed registrants, $120.00.

Application for licensure or certification, $100.00, except application for:

Barbering or cosmetology schools and shops, $300.00.

Subdivision (b)(2)(B) effective June 1, 2023.

Funeral directors, embalmers, crematory personnel, removal personnel, funeral establishments, crematory establishments, and limited services establishments, $70.00.

Application for real estate appraisers, $275.00.

Temporary real estate appraiser license, $150.00.

Appraisal management company registration, $600.00.

Private investigator or security services agency, $340.00.

Private investigator and security services agency, $400.00.

Private investigator or security services sole proprietor, $250.00.

Private investigator or security services unarmed licensee, $150.00.

Private investigator or security services armed licensee, $200.00.

Private investigator and security services instructor, $120.00.

Optician trainee registration, $50.00.

Biennial renewal, $240.00, except biennial renewal for:

Independent clinical social workers and master’s social workers, $150.00.

Occupational therapists and assistants, $150.00.

Physical therapists and assistants, $150.00.

Optician trainees, $100.00.

Barbers, cosmetologists, nail technicians, and estheticians, $130.00.

Schools of barbering or cosmetology, $300.00.

Subdivision (b)(4)(G) effective June 1, 2023.

Funeral directors and embalmers, $280.00.

Subdivision (b)(4)(H) effective June 1, 2023.

Crematory personnel and removal personnel, $100.00.

Subdivision (b)(4)(I) effective June 1, 2023.

Funeral establishments, crematory establishments, and limited services establishments, $640.00.

[Repealed.]

Radiologic therapist, radiologic technologist, nuclear medicine technologist, $150.00.

Certified alcohol and drug abuse counselor, certified apprentice addiction professional, and licensed alcohol and drug abuse counselor, $225.00.

Private investigator or security services agency, or both, $300.00.

Private investigator or security services unarmed licensee, $120.00.

Private investigator or security services armed licensee, $180.00.

Private investigator or security services unarmed registrant, $80.00.

Private investigator or security services armed registrant, $130.00.

Private investigator or security services sole proprietor, $250.00.

Private investigator or security services instructor, $180.00.

Limited temporary license or work permit, $50.00.

Radiologic evaluation, $125.00.

Annual renewal for appraisal management company registration, $300.00.

Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, a board shall not require payment of renewal fees for years during which a license was lapsed.

Pursuant to qualifications and procedures determined by the Director, the Office shall, upon request, waive application fees to qualified military members and military spouses.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1997, No. 40

, § 3;

1997, No. 59

, § 45, eff. June 30, 1997;

1997, No. 145

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 45;

2001, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. June 21, 2002;

2005, No. 27

, § 2;

2005, No. 72

, § 7;

2009, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2015, No. 38

, § 1, eff. May 28, 2015;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 21, 2018;

2019, No. 70

, § 13;

2019, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 1, 2021;

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.

§ 126.
Agent for process; nonresident licensees.

Whenever a person practicing a profession attached to the Office resides outside the borders of the State and fails to appoint an agent for process, the Secretary of State shall be an agent of that person, upon whom any process, notice, or demand may be served.
In the event any process, notice, or demand is served on the Secretary of State, the Secretary shall immediately cause one of the copies thereof to be forwarded by certified mail, addressed to the person at its registered Office.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 127.
Unauthorized practice.

When the Office receives a complaint of unauthorized practice, the Director shall refer the complaint to Office investigators and prosecutors.

A person practicing a regulated profession without authority or an employer permitting such practice may, upon the complaint of the Attorney General or a State’s Attorney or an attorney assigned by the Office of Professional Regulation, be enjoined therefrom by the Superior Court where the violation occurred or the Washington County Superior Court and may be assessed a civil penalty of not more than $5,000.00.
(b) (1) A person practicing a regulated profession without authority or an employer permitting such practice may, upon the complaint of the Attorney General or a State’s Attorney or an attorney assigned by the Office of Professional Regulation, be enjoined therefrom by the Superior Court where the violation occurred or the Washington County Superior Court and may be assessed a civil penalty of not more than $5,000.00.

The Attorney General or an attorney assigned by the Office of Professional Regulation may elect to bring an action seeking only a civil penalty of not more than $2,500.00 for practicing or permitting the practice of a regulated profession without authority before the board having regulatory authority over the profession or before an administrative law officer.
(2) (A) The Attorney General or an attorney assigned by the Office of Professional Regulation may elect to bring an action seeking only a civil penalty of not more than $2,500.00 for practicing or permitting the practice of a regulated profession without authority before the board having regulatory authority over the profession or before an administrative law officer.

Hearings shall be conducted in the same manner as disciplinary hearings.

A civil penalty imposed by a board or administrative law officer under this subsection (b) shall be deposited in the Professional Regulatory Fee Fund established in section 124 of this chapter for the purpose of providing education and training for board members and advisor appointees.
(3) (A) A civil penalty imposed by a board or administrative law officer under this subsection (b) shall be deposited in the Professional Regulatory Fee Fund established in section 124 of this chapter for the purpose of providing education and training for board members and advisor appointees.

The Director shall detail in the annual report receipts and expenses from these civil penalties.

In addition to other provisions of law, unauthorized practice shall be punishable by a fine of not more than $5,000.00 or imprisonment for not more than one year, or both. Prosecution may occur upon the complaint of the Attorney General or a State’s Attorney or an attorney assigned by the Office of Professional Regulation under this section and shall not act as a bar to civil or administrative proceedings involving the same conduct.

A person whose license has expired for not more than one biennial period may reinstate the license by meeting renewal requirements for the profession, paying the profession’s renewal fee, and paying the following nondisciplinary reinstatement penalty:
(d) (1) A person whose license has expired for not more than one biennial period may reinstate the license by meeting renewal requirements for the profession, paying the profession’s renewal fee, and paying the following nondisciplinary reinstatement penalty:

if reinstatement occurs within 30 days after the expiration date, $100.00; or

if reinstatement occurs more than 30 days after the expiration date, an amount equal to the renewal fee increased by $40.00 for every additional month or fraction of a month, provided the total penalty shall not exceed $1,500.00.

Fees assessed under this subsection shall be deposited into the Regulatory Fee Fund and credited to the appropriate fund for the profession of the reinstating licensee.

A licensee seeking reinstatement may submit a petition for relief from the reinstatement penalty, which a board may grant only upon a finding of exceptional circumstances or extreme hardship to the licensee; provided, however, that fees under this subsection shall not be assessed for any period during which a licensee was a member of the U.S. Armed Forces on active duty.

Practice by a licensee with an expired license that continues for more than two years, or practicing at any time when the licensee knew or should have known the license was expired, may be prosecuted by the State as unauthorized practice under this section or as unprofessional conduct pursuant to subdivision 129a(a)(3) of this title.

A person practicing a licensed profession without authority shall not institute any proceedings in this State for the enforcement of any right or obligation if at the time of the creation of the right or obligation the unlicensed person was acting without authority.

The provisions of this section shall be in addition to any other remedies or penalties for unauthorized practice established by law.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1995, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. May 1, 1996;

1995, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. May 15, 1996;

2003, No. 60

, § 1; No. 66, § 84;

2005, No. 27

, § 3;

2005, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2015, No. 38

, § 2, eff. May 28, 2015;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2019, No. 30

, § 3.

§ 128.
Disciplinary action to be reported to the Office.

Any hospital, clinic, community mental health center, or other health care institution in which a licensee performs professional services shall report to the Office, along with supporting information and evidence, any disciplinary action taken by it or its staff that limits or conditions the licensee’s privilege to practice or leads to suspension or expulsion from the institution.
(a) (1) Any hospital, clinic, community mental health center, or other health care institution in which a licensee performs professional services shall report to the Office, along with supporting information and evidence, any disciplinary action taken by it or its staff that limits or conditions the licensee’s privilege to practice or leads to suspension or expulsion from the institution.

The report shall be made within 10 days of the date the disciplinary action was taken, regardless of whether the action is the subject of a pending appeal, and in the case of a licensee who is employed by, or under contract with, a community mental health center, a copy of the report shall also be sent to the Commissioners of Mental Health and of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living.

This section shall not apply to cases of resignation, separation from service, or changes in privileges that are unrelated to:

a disciplinary or adverse action;

an adverse action report to the National Practitioner Data Bank;

an unexpected adverse outcome in the care or treatment of a patient;

misconduct or allegations of misconduct;

the initiation or process of an action to limit, condition, or suspend a licensee’s privilege to practice in an institution;

an action to expel the licensee from an institution; or

any other action that could lead to an outcome described in subdivisions (A) through (F) of this subdivision (3).

Within 30 days of any judgment or settlements involving a claim of professional negligence by a licensee, any insurer of the licensee shall report such information to the Office, regardless of whether the action is the subject of a pending appeal.

Information provided to the Office under this section shall be confidential unless the Office decides to treat the report as a complaint, in which case the provisions of section 131 of this title shall apply.

A person who acts in good faith in accord with the provisions of this section shall not be liable for damages in any civil action.

A person who violates this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than $1,000.00.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1995, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2001, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 13, 2002;

2011, No. 66

, § 1, eff. June 1, 2011;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2013, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2017, No. 48

, § 2;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 4.